Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5780.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 30-3-40.3 of the General Laws in Chapter 30-3 entitled "National
Guard" is hereby amended to read as follows:
30-3-40.3. Educational benefits for National Guard members.
(a) Any person who is an active member in good standing of the Rhode Island national
guard, and who is eligible to attend at any state college or university in Rhode Island, will be eligible
for a tuition assistance educational benefit amounting to five (5) courses per semester at any Rhode
Island state college or university. National Guard members may allocate their state-sponsored
tuition assistance benefits to their dependents. Dependents are defined as immediate family
members enrolled in the Defense Enrollment Eligibility Reporting System (DEERS). Basic tuition
or general fee charges to be waived for said five (5) courses. Each of the state colleges or
universities shall receive an equal share of the educational account funding for Rhode Island
national guard members, the account to be administered by the office of the adjutant general. The
exact amount for each institution shall be determined by the board of governors. The total amount
of funds in the education account shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in any
fiscal year.
(b) In order to be eligible for tuition waivers for themself or their dependent, a person must
remain a member in good standing in the Rhode Island national guard and a student in good
standing at any state college or university. A member in good standing is defined as any soldier or
airperson of the Rhode Island national guard who is currently satisfactorily participating in all unit

training assemblies and annual training periods, as so certified by the adjutant general.
(c) Those guard members wishing to participate in this program must enter into a
contractual enlistment commitment that provides for one year of obligated service in the Rhode
Island national guard for each twelve (12) course credits or four (4) three-credit (3) courses where
the soldier’s or airperson’s or their dependents tuition will be waived. Such assistance shall be
available for courses creditable to associate, bachelor’s, or master’s degrees. Failure to
satisfactorily fulfill the service obligation incurred in return for tuition assistance will require the
participant to repay a pro-rata share of said assistance. This obligation shall be considered to be a
debt owed to the state and may be satisfied by offset against any state transfer payments or state
income tax refunds. The participating member shall reimburse the Rhode Island national guard
when any of the following occur: the soldier fails to participate satisfactorily as a member of the
Rhode Island national guard; the soldier withdraws from, or fails to complete, a course for personal
reasons; the soldier fails to make up an incomplete grade within time limits stipulated by the
institution or one hundred twenty (120) days after the completion of the class, whichever occurs
first; or the soldier fails to provide the adjutant general a copy of the grade report within thirty (30)
days of course completion and may be subject to punishment under the Rhode Island military code.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001631
========
LC001631 - Page 2 of 3